North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Part 3. Landowner Protection.

§ 113-420.
Notice and entry to property.

Notice Required for Activities That Do Not Disturb Surface of Property to Surface Owner. — If an oil or gas developer or operator is not the surface owner of the property on which oil and gas operations are to occur, before entering the property for oil or gas operations that do not disturb the surface, including inspections, staking, surveys, measurements, and general evaluation of proposed routes and sites for oil or gas drilling operations, the developer or operator shall give written notice to the surface owner at least 14 days before the desired date of entry to the property. Notice shall be given by certified mail, return receipt requested. The requirements of this subsection may not be waived by agreement of the parties. The notice, at a minimum, shall include all of the following:

The identity of person(s) requesting entry upon the property.

The purpose for entry on the property.

The dates, times, and location on which entry to the property will occur, including the estimated number of entries.

Notice Required for Land-Disturbing Activities to Surface Owner. — If an oil or gas developer or operator is not the surface owner of the property on which oil or gas operations are to occur, before entering the property for oil or gas operations that disturb the surface, the developer or operator shall give written notice to the surface owner at least 30 days before the desired date of entry to the property. Notice shall be given by certified mail, return receipt requested. The notice, at a minimum, shall include all of the following:

A description of the exploration or development plan, including, but not limited to (i) the proposed locations of any roads, drill pads, pipeline routes, and other alterations to the surface estate and (ii) the proposed date on or after which the proposed alterations will begin.

An offer of the oil and gas developer or operator to consult with the surface owner to review and discuss the location of the proposed alterations.

The name, address, telephone number, and title of a contact person employed by or representing the oil or gas developer or operator who the surface owner may contact following the receipt of notice concerning the location of the proposed alterations.

(b1)

Persons Entering Land; Identification Required; Presumption of Proper Protection While on Surface Owners’ Property. — Persons who enter land on behalf of an oil or gas developer or operator for oil and gas operations shall carry on their person identification sufficient to identify themselves and their employer or principal and shall present the identification to the surface owner upon request. Entry upon land by such a person creates a rebuttable presumption that the surface owner properly protected the person against personal injury or property damage while the person was on the land.

(b2)

Notice of Initiation of Exploration, Development, and Production Activities to Owner of Subsurface Oil or Gas Resources. — If an oil or gas developer or operator is the lessee of subsurface oil or gas resources, before initiating oil or gas exploration or development operations with respect to those resources, the developer or operator shall give written notice to the lessor of those resources at least 30 days before the oil and gas operations are to be initiated. The notice, at a minimum, shall include all of the following:

(1)

A description of the exploration or development plan, including, the proposed date on which the exploration or development will begin.

(2)

The name, address, telephone number, and title of a contact person employed by or representing the oil or gas developer or operator who the lessor may contact following the receipt of notice.

Venue. — If the oil or gas developer or operator fails to give notice or otherwise comply with the provisions of this section, the surface owner may seek appropriate relief in the superior court for the county in which the oil or gas well is located and may receive actual damages.

History.

2011-276, s. 3(b); 2012-143, s. 4(a); 2014-4, s. 12.

§ 113-421.
Presumptive liability for water contamination; compensation for other damages; responsibility for reclamation.

Presumptive Liability for Water Contamination. — It shall be presumed that an oil or gas developer or operator is responsible for contamination of all water supplies that are within a one-half mile radius of a wellhead that is part of the oil or gas developer’s or operator’s activities unless the presumption is rebutted by a defense established as set forth in subsection (a1) of this subsection. If a contaminated water supply is located within a one-half mile radius of a wellhead, in addition to any other remedy available at law or in equity, including payment of compensation for damage to a water supply, the developer or operator shall provide a replacement water supply to the surface owner and other persons using the water supply at the time the oil or gas developer’s activities were commenced on the property, which water supply shall be adequate in quality and quantity for those persons’ use.

(a1)

[Rebuttal of Presumption.]

In order to rebut a presumption arising pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, an oil or gas developer or operator shall have the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence any of the following:

The contamination existed prior to the commencement of the drilling activities of the oil or gas developer or operator, as evidenced by a pre-drilling test of the water supply in question conducted in conformance with G.S. 113-423(f).

The surface owner or owner of the water supply in question refused the oil or gas developer or operator access to conduct a pre-drilling test of the water supply conducted in conformance with G.S. 113-423(f).

The water supply in question is not within a one-half mile radius of a wellhead that is part of the oil or gas developer’s or operator’s activities.

The contamination occurred as the result of a cause other than activities of the developer or operator.

(a2)

Compensation for Other Damages Required. —

The oil or gas developer or operator shall be obligated to pay the surface owner compensation for all of the following:

(1)

Any damage to a water supply in use prior to the commencement of the activities of the developer or operator which is due to those activities.

(2)

The cost of repair of personal property of the surface owner, which personal property is damaged due to activities of the developer or operator, up to the value of replacement by personal property of like age, wear, and quality.

(3)

Damage to any livestock, crops, or timber determined according to the market value of the resources destroyed, damaged, or prevented from reaching market due to the oil or gas developer’s or operator’s activities.

(a3)

Reclamation of Surface Property Required. —

An oil or gas developer or operator shall:

(1)

Reclaim all surface areas affected by its operations no later than two years following completion of the operations. If the developer or operator is not the surface owner of the property, prior to commencement of activities on the property, the oil or gas developer or operator shall provide a bond running to the surface owner sufficient to cover reclamation of the surface owner’s property. Upon registration with the Department pursuant to

G.S. 113-378

, a developer shall request that the Oil and Gas Commission set the amount of the bond required by this subsection. As part of its request, the developer shall provide supporting documentation, including information about the proposed oil and gas activities to be conducted, the site on which they are to occur, and any additional information required by the Commission. The Commission shall set the amount of the bond in accordance with the criteria adopted by the Commission pursuant to G.S. 113-391(a)(13a) and notify the developer and surface owner of the amount within 30 days of setting the amount of a bond. A surface owner or developer may appeal the amount of a bond set pursuant to this subsection to the Commission within 60 days after receipt of notice from the Commission of the amount required. After evaluation of the appeal and issuance of written findings, the Commission may order that the amount of the bond be modified. Parties aggrieved by a decision of the Commission pursuant to this subsection may appeal the decision as provided under Article 4 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes within 30 days of the date of the decision.

(2)

Provide a bond running to the State sufficient to cover any potential environmental damage caused by the drilling process in an amount no less than one million dollars ($1,000,000). The Commission may increase the amount of the bond required by this subdivision if the Commission determines that the drilling operation would be sited in an environmentally sensitive area.

(a4)

Remediation Required. —

Nothing in this Article shall be construed to obviate or affect the obligation of a developer or operator to comply with any other requirement under law to remediate contamination caused by its activities.

(a5)

Replacement Water Supply Required. —

If a water supply belonging to the surface owner or third parties is contaminated due to the activities of the developer or operator, in addition to any other remedy available at law or in equity, the developer or operator shall provide a replacement water supply to persons using the water supply at the time the oil or gas developer’s activities were commenced on the property, which water supply shall be adequate in quality and quantity for those persons’ use.

Time Frame for Compensation. — When compensation is required, the surface owner shall have the option of accepting a one-time payment or annual payments for a period of time not less than 10 years.

Venue. — The surface owner has the right to seek damages pursuant to this section in the superior court for the county in which the oil or gas well is located. The superior court for the county in which the oil or gas well is located has jurisdiction over all proceedings brought pursuant to this section. If the surface owner or the surface owner’s assignee is the prevailing party in an action to recover unpaid royalties or other damages owed due to activities of the developer or operator, the court shall award any court costs and reasonable attorneys’ fees to the surface owner or the surface owner’s assignee.

[Certain Limits Void. —] Conditions precedent, notice provisions, or arbitration clauses included in lease documents that have the effect of limiting access to the superior court in the county in which the oil or gas well is located are void and unenforceable.

Joint and Several Liability. — In order to provide maximum protection for the public interest, any actions brought for recovery of cleanup costs, damages, or for civil penalties brought pursuant to this section or any other section of this Article or rules adopted thereunder may be brought against any one or more of the persons having control over the activities that contributed to the contamination, damage to property, or other violations. All such persons shall be jointly and severally liable, but ultimate liability as between the parties may be determined by common-law principles.

History.

2011-276, s. 3(b); 2012-143, s. 4(b); 2013-365, s. 5(c); 2014-4, ss. 4(c), 13(a).

§ 113-422.
Indemnification.

An oil or gas developer or operator shall indemnify and hold harmless a surface owner against any claims related to the developer’s or operator’s activities on the surface owner’s property, including, but not limited to, (i) claims of injury or death to any person; (ii) damage to impacted infrastructure or water supplies; (iii) damage to a third party’s real or personal property; and (iv) violations of any federal, State, or local law, rule, regulation, or ordinance, including those for protection of the environment.

History.

2011-276, s. 3(b); 2012-143, s. 4(c).

§ 113-423.
Required lease terms.

Required Information to be Provided to Potential Lessors and Surface Owners. — Prior to executing a lease for oil and gas rights or any other conveyance of any kind separating rights to oil or gas from the freehold estate of surface property, an oil or gas developer or operator, or any agent thereof, shall provide the lessor with a copy of this Part and a publication produced by the Consumer Protection Division of the North Carolina Department of Justice entitled “Oil & Gas Leases: Landowners’ Rights.” If the lessor is not the surface owner of the property, the oil or gas developer or operator shall also provide the surface owner with a copy of this Part and the publication prior to execution of a lease for oil and gas rights.

Maximum Duration. — Any lease of oil or gas rights or any other conveyance of any kind separating rights to oil or gas from the freehold estate of surface property shall expire at the end of 10 years from the date the lease is executed, unless, at the end of the 10-year period, oil or gas is being produced for commercial purposes from the land to which the lease applies. If, at any time after the 10-year period, commercial production of oil or gas is terminated for a period of six months or more, all rights to the oil or gas shall revert to the surface owner of the property to which the lease pertains. No assignment or agreement to waive the provisions of this subsection shall be valid or enforceable. As used in this subsection, the term “production” includes the actual production of oil or gas by a lessee, or when activities are being conducted by the lessee for injection, withdrawal, storage, or disposal of water, gas, or other fluids, or when rentals or royalties are being paid by the lessee. No force majeure clause shall operate to extend a lease beyond the time frames set forth in this subsection.

Minimum Royalty Payments. — Any lease of oil or gas rights or any other conveyance of any kind separating rights to oil or gas from the freehold estate of surface property shall provide that the lessor shall receive a royalty payment of not less than twelve and one-half percent (12.5%) of the proceeds of sale of all oil or gas produced from the lessor’s just and equitable share of the oil and gas in the pool, which sum shall not be diminished by pre-production or post-production costs, fees, or other charges assessed by the oil or gas developer or operator against the property owner. Royalty payments shall commence no later than six months after the date of first sale of product from the drilling operations subject to the lease and thereafter no later than 60 days after the end of the calendar quarter within which subsequent production is sold. At the time each royalty payment is made, the oil or gas developer or operator shall provide documentation to the lessor on the time period for which the royalty payment is made, the quantity of product sold within that period, and the price received, at a minimum. If royalty payments have not been made within the required time frames, the lessor shall be entitled to interest on the unpaid royalties commencing on the payment due date at the rate of twelve and one-half percent (12.5%) per annum on the unpaid amounts. Upon written request, the lessor shall be entitled to inspect and copy records of the oil or gas developer or operator related to production and royalty payments associated with the lease.

Bonus Payments. — Any bonus payments, or other initial payments, due under a lease of oil or gas rights or any other conveyance of any kind separating rights to oil or gas from the freehold estate of surface property shall be paid by the lessee to the lessor within 60 days of execution of a lease. If a bonus payment or other initial payment has not been made within the required time frame, the lessor shall be entitled to interest on the unpaid amount commencing on the payment due date at the rate of ten percent (10%) per annum on the unpaid amount.

Agreements for Use of Other Resources; Associated Payments. — Any lease of oil or gas rights or any other conveyance of any kind separating rights to oil or gas from the freehold estate of surface property shall clearly state whether the oil or gas developer or operator shall use groundwater or surface water supplies located on the property and, if so, shall clearly state the estimated amount of water to be withdrawn from the supplies on the property, and shall require permission of the surface owner therefore. At a minimum, water used by the developer or operator shall not restrict the supply of water for domestic uses by the surface owner. The lease shall provide for full compensation to the surface owner for water used from the property by the developer or operator in an amount not less than the fair market value of the water consumed based on water sales in the area at the time of use.

Pre-Drilling Testing of Water Supplies. — Any lease of oil or gas rights or any other conveyance of any kind separating rights to oil or gas from the freehold estate of surface property shall include a clause that requires the oil or gas developer or operator to pay for the reasonable costs involved in testing all water supplies within a one-half mile radius from a proposed wellhead that is part of the oil or gas developer’s or operator’s activities at least 30 days prior to initial drilling activities and at least five follow-up tests at six months, 12 months, 18 months, and 24 months after production has commenced and a test within 30 days after completion of production activities at the site. The Department shall identify the location of all water supplies, including wells, on a property on which drilling operations are proposed to occur. A surface owner shall use an independent third party selected from a laboratory certified by the Department’s Wastewater/Groundwater Laboratory Certification program to sample wells located on their property, and the developer or operator shall pay for the reasonable costs involved in testing of the wells in question. Developers and operators may share analytical results obtained with other developers and operators as necessary or advisable. All analytical results from testing conducted pursuant to this section (i) shall be provided to the Department within 30 days of testing and (ii) shall constitute a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes, and the Department shall post any results to the Department’s Web site within 30 days of receipt of the results. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to preclude or impair the right of any surface owner to refuse pre-drilling testing of wells located on their property.

Recordation of Leases. — Any lease of oil or gas rights or any other conveyance of any kind separating rights to oil or gas from the freehold estate of surface property, including assignments of such leases, shall be recorded within 30 days of execution in the register of deeds office in the county that the land that is subject to the lease is located.

Notice of Assignment Required. — Written notice of assignment of any lease of oil or gas rights or any other conveyance of any kind separating rights to oil or gas from the freehold estate of surface property shall be provided to the lessor within 30 days of such assignment. If the surface owner of the property is not the lessor, written notice of assignment of any lease of oil or gas rights shall also be given to the surface owner of the property to which the lease pertains within 30 days of such assignment.

Lender Approval of Lease. — Any lease for oil or gas rights or any other conveyance of any kind separating rights to oil or gas from the freehold estate of surface property with a surface owner shall include a conspicuous boldface disclosure concerning notification to lenders, which shall be initialed by the surface owner, and state the following:

Click to view

Seven-Day Right of Rescission. — Any lease of oil or gas rights or any other conveyance of any kind separating rights to oil or gas from the freehold estate of surface property shall be subject to a seven-day right of rescission in which the lessor or lessee may cancel the lease. A bold and conspicuous notice of this right of rescission shall be included in all such leases. In order to cancel the lease, the lessor or lessee shall notify the other party in writing within seven business days of execution of the lease, and the lessor shall return any sums paid by the lessee to the lessor under the terms of the lease.

NOTICE TO LENDER(S) PRIOR TO EXECUTION OF LEASE: Surface owners are advised to secure written approval from any lender who holds a mortgage or deed of trust on any portion of the surface property involved in the lease prior to execution of the lease and obtain written confirmation that execution of the lease will not violate any provision associated with any applicable mortgage or deed of trust, which could potentially result in foreclosure. I have read and understood the terms of this provision. Surface Owner’s Initials

History.

2011-276, s. 3(b); 2012-143, s. 4(d); 2012-201, s. 12(d); 2014-4, s. 13(b).

§ 113-423.1.
Surface activities.

Agreements on Rights and Obligations of Parties. — The developer or operator and the surface owner may enter into a mutually acceptable agreement that sets forth the rights and obligations of the parties with respect to the surface activities conducted by the developer or operator.

Minimization of Intrusion Required. — An oil or gas developer or operator shall conduct oil and gas operations in a manner that accommodates the surface owner by minimizing intrusion upon and damage to the surface of the land. As used in this subsection, “minimizing intrusion upon and damage to the surface” means selecting alternative locations for wells, roads, pipelines, or production facilities, or employing alternative means of operation that prevent, reduce, or mitigate the impacts of the oil and gas operations on the surface, where such alternatives are technologically sound, economically practicable, and reasonably available to the operator. The standard of conduct set forth in this subsection shall not be construed to (i) prevent an operator from entering upon and using that amount of the surface as is reasonable and necessary to explore for, develop, and produce oil and gas and (ii) abrogate or impair a contractual provision binding on the parties that expressly provides for the use of the surface for the conduct of oil and gas operations or that releases the operator from liability for the use of the surface. Failure of an oil or gas developer or operator to comply with the requirements of this subsection shall give rise to a cause of action by the surface owner. Upon a determination by the trier of fact that such failure has occurred, a surface owner may seek compensatory damages and equitable relief. In any litigation or arbitration based upon this subsection, the surface owner shall present evidence that the developer’s or operator’s use of the surface materially interfered with the surface owner’s use of the surface of the land. After such showing, the developer or operator shall bear the burden of proof of showing that it minimized intrusion upon and damage to the surface of the land in accordance with the provisions of this subsection. If a developer or operator makes that showing, the surface owner may present rebuttal evidence. A developer or operator may assert, as an affirmative defense, that it has conducted oil or gas operations in accordance with a regulatory requirement, contractual obligation, or land-use plan provision that is specifically applicable to the alleged intrusion or damage. Nothing in this subsection shall do any of the following:

Preclude or impair any person from obtaining any and all other remedies allowed by law.

Prevent a developer or operator and a surface owner from addressing the use of the surface for oil and gas operations in a lease, surface use agreement, or other written contract.

Establish, alter, impair, or negate the authority of local governments to regulate land use related to oil and gas operations.

History.

2012-143, s. 4(e).

§ 113-424.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-143, s. 4(f), effective July 2, 2012.

History.

2011-276, s. 3(b); repealed by 2012-143, s. 4(f), effective July 2, 2012.

§ 113-425.
Registry of landmen required.

Establishment of Registry. — The Department of Environmental Quality, in consultation with the Consumer Protection Division of the North Carolina Department of Justice, shall establish and maintain a registry of landmen operating in this State. As used in this section, “landman” means a person that, in the course and scope of the person’s business, does any of the following:

Acquires or manages oil or gas interests.

Performs title or contract functions related to the exploration, exploitation, or disposition of oil or gas interests.

Negotiates for the acquisition or divestiture of oil or gas rights, including the acquisition or divestiture of land or oil or gas rights for a pipeline.

Negotiates business agreements that provide for the exploration for or development of oil or gas.

Registration Required. — A person may not act , offer to act, or hold oneself out as a landman in this State unless the person is registered with the Department in accordance with this section. To apply for registration as a landman, a person shall submit an application to the Department on a form to be provided by the Department, which shall include, at a minimum, all of the following information:

The name of the applicant or, if the applicant is not an individual, the names and addresses of all principals of the applicant.

The business address, telephone number, and electronic mail address of the applicant.

The social security number of the applicant or, if the applicant is not an individual, the federal employer identification number of the applicant.

A list of all states and other jurisdictions in which the applicant holds or has held a similar registration or license.

A list of all states and other jurisdictions in which the applicant has had a similar registration or license suspended or revoked.

A statement whether any pending judgments or tax liens exist against the applicant.

The Department may deny registration to an applicant, reprimand a registrant, suspend or revoke a registration, or impose a civil penalty on a registrant if the Department determines that the applicant or registrant does any of the following:

Fraudulently or deceptively obtains, or attempts to obtain, a registration.

Uses or attempts to use an expired, suspended, or revoked registration.

Falsely represents oneself as a registered landman.

Engages in any other fraud, deception, misrepresentation, or knowing omission of material facts related to oil or gas interests.

Had a similar registration or license denied, suspended, or revoked in another state or jurisdiction.

Otherwise violates this section.

An applicant may challenge a denial, suspension, or revocation of a registration or a reprimand issued pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, as provided in Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

The Department shall adopt rules as necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

History.

2012-143, s. 4(g); 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

§ 113-426.
Publication of information for landowners.

In order to effect the pre-lease publication distribution requirement as set forth in G.S. 113-423(a), and to otherwise inform the public, the Consumer Protection Division of the North Carolina Department of Justice, in consultation with the North Carolina Real Estate Commission, shall develop and make available a publication entitled “Oil & Gas Leases: Landowners’ Rights” to provide general information on consumer protection issues and landowner rights, including information on leases of oil or gas rights, applicable to exploration and extraction of gas or oil. The Division and the Commission shall update the publication as necessary.

History.

2012-143, s. 4(h).

§ 113-427.
Additional remedies.

The remedies provided by this Part are not exclusive and do not preclude any other remedies that may be allowed by law.

History.

2012-143, s. 4(i).